src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Noun inflection for Mansi
! ----------------

!! This file contains the noun inflection. 


! This documentation is obsolete (see below):

! Stems ending in V
! 1. N01 = stem ending in (а|о|у|э|а̄|о̄|ӯ|э̄|я|ё|ю|е|я̄|ё̄|ю̄|е̄)
! 1. N02 = stem ending in (и|ы|ӣ|ы̄)

! Stems ending in C
! 1. N13 = stem ending in (г|ӈ|в|к|кв|м|п|р|х)
! 1. N14 = stem ending in (ль|нь|ть)
! 1. N16 = stem ending in (й)
! 1. N17 = stem ending in (б|д|ф|ц|ч|ш|з|ж)
! 1. N18 = stem ending in (бь|дь|фь|ць|чь|шь|зь|жь|рь)
! 1. N19 = stem ending in (щ)

! Stems ending in CC
! 1. N23 = stem ending in C and (г|ӈ|в|к|кв|м|п|р|х)
! 1. N24 = stem ending in C and (л|н|т|с)
! 1. N25 = stem ending in C and (ль|нь|ть)
! 1. N26 = stem ending in C and (й)
! 1. N27 = stem ending in C and (б|д|ф|ц|ч|ш|з|ж)
! 1. N28 = stem ending in C and (бь|дь|фь|ць|чь|шь|зь|жь|рь)
! 1. N29 = stem ending in C and (щ)

! Stems ending in CCC
! 1. N33 = stem ending in CC and (г|ӈ|в|к|кв|м|п|р|х)
! 1. N34 = stem ending in CC and (л|н|т|с)
! 1. N35 = stem ending in CC and (ль|нь|ть)
! 1. N36 = stem ending in CC and (й)
! 1. N37 = stem ending in CC and (б|д|ф|ц|ч|ш|з|ж)
! 1. N38 = stem ending in CC and (бь|дь|фь|ць|чь|шь|зь|жь|рь)
! 1. N29 = stem ending in CC and (щ)

! Stems with syncopating vowel
! 1. N4311 = syncopating stems ending in -ыг
! 1. N4321 = syncopating stems ending in -иг
! 1. N4331 = syncopating stems ending in -ыӈ
! 1. N4341 = syncopating stems ending in -иӈ
! 1. N4411 = syncopating stems ending in -ыл
! 1. N4421 = syncopating stems ending in -ил
! 1. N4431 = syncopating stems ending in -ын
! 1. N4441 = syncopating stems ending in -ин
! 1. N4511 = syncopating stems ending in -ум
! 1. N4521 = syncopating stems ending in -ым
! 1. N4531 = syncopating stems ending in -уп
! 1. N4611 = syncopating stems ending in -ыр
! 1. N4621 = syncopating stems ending in -ир
! 1. N4711 = syncopating stems ending in -ых
! 1. N4721 = syncopating stems ending in -их

! 1. N53 = irregular paradigm of хум

!! All Mansi nouns have the same suffixe, thus only one continuation lexica.
!! The stem vowel alternation is taken care of in the twolc file.

!! ## The lexicon
LEXICON N_VI !!≈ * @CODE@ Stems ending in и ы: а̄ви
:%{VI%} N1_SG ;
:%{VI%} N1_DU ;
:%{VI%} N1_PL ;
:%{VI%} SG_NOM_PXSG3_te ;
:%{VI%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_te ;
:%{VI%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC/TRA_PXSG3_tee ;
:%{VI%} N1_SG_X_PXDU_LONG ;
:%{VI%} SG_NOM_PXDU1_ujumeen ;
:%{VI%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC_PXDU1_ujumen ;
:%{VI%}	SG_X_PXDU2_yyn ;
:%{VI%}	SG_X_PXDU2_yn ;
:%{VI%} SG_X_PXDU3_teen ;
:%{VI%} SG_X_PXDU3_ten ;
:%{VI%} SG_X_PXPL2_yyn ;

:%{VI%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagameen ;
:%{VI%}	DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyn ;
:%{VI%}	DU_X_PXDU3_ajagen ;
:%{VI%}	DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyn ;
:%{VI%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagmeen ;
:%{VI%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagamen ;
:%{VI%}	DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyyn ;
:%{VI%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajageen ;

:%{VI%}  DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyyn ;


:%{VI%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanmeen ;
:%{VI%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanmen ;
:%{VI%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyyn ;
:%{VI%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyn ;
:%{VI%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajan ;
:%{VI%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajaneen ;
:%{VI%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajanen ;

:%{VI%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyyn ;
:%{VI%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyn ;
:%{VI%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;
:%{VI%} SG_NOM_PXDU1_ujumeen ; ! ? +N+Sg+Nom %{уØ%} м е̄ н 2023_04_29 са̄лыме̄н
:%{VI%} SG_NOM_PXDU1_ujumen ; !  2023_04_29 са̄лымен
!@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@P.PossPx.Du1@

LEXICON N_VO !!≈ * @CODE@ Stems ending in other vowels ӯра
!!:%{VO%} N1_ ;
:%{VO%} N1_SG ;
:%{VO%} N1_DU ;
:%{VO%} N1_PL ;
:%{VO%}%>ытыт PL_LOC_K ; ! я̄тыт
:%{VO%} N1_SG_X_PXDU_SHORT ;
:%{VO%} SG_ABL/INS/LAT/LOC_PXDU1_ujumeen ;
:%{VO%} SG_X_PXDU2_yyn ;
:%{VO%} SG_X_PXDU3_teen ;
:%{VO%} SG_X_PXPL2_yyn ;

:%{VO%} N1_DU_X_PXDU_SHORT ;
+Du+Nom+PxPl2:%{VO%}%>%{аяØ%}гы̄н K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:%{VO%}%>%{аяØ%}ны̄н K ;
:%{VO%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagameen ;
:%{VO%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagmen ;
:%{VO%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajageen ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanameen ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanamen ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajan ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyyn ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyn ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajaneen ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajanen ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyn ;
:%{VO%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;
:%{VO%} SG_NOM_PXDU1_ujumeen ; ! ? +N+Sg+Nom %{уØ%} м е̄ н 2023_04_29 са̄лыме̄н
:%{VO%} SG_NOM_PXDU1_ujumen ; !  2023_04_29 са̄лымен


LEXICON N_SYNCH !!≈ * @CODE@ Stems with syncopy, hard
:%{SYNCH%}%>ныл SG_ABL_K ;
:%{SYNCH%}%>ыл SG_INS_K ; !
:%{SYNCH%}%>н SG_LAT_K ; !
:%{SYNCH%}%>ын SG_LAT_K ; !
:%{SYNCH%}%>т SG_LOC_K ; !
:%{SYNCH%}%>ыт SG_LOC_K ; !
:%{SYNCH%} SG_NOM_K ;
:%{SYNCH%}%>ыг SG_TRA_K ;!
:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXSG1_ujum ;
:%{SYNCH%}  SG_X_PXSG2_yn ;
:%{SYNCH%}  SG_X_PXSG3_te ;
:%{SYNCH%}  SG_X_PXSG3_tee ;
:%{SYNCH%}  SG_X_PXPL1_ujuv ;
:%{SYNCH%}  SG_X_PXPL3_ajanyl ;
  

:%{SYNCH%} N1_DU ;
:%{SYNCH%} N1_PL ;

:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU2_yyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU3_een ;
:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXPL2_yyn ;! Is the nominative differerent from the oblique cases

:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajageen ;
:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyyn ;


:%{SYNCH%}%>ытыт PL_LOC_K ;! потрытыт 2023_03_11
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajaneen ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyyn ;

:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU1_ajameen ;
:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU1_ajamen ;
:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU2_yyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU2_yn ;
:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU3_en ;


:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagmen ;
:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXDU3_ajageen ;

:%{SYNCH%}%>ытын PL_LAT_K ;! 
:%{SYNCH%}%>ытыт PL_LOC_K ;! потрытыт 2023_03_11
!:%{SYNCH%}%>ытл PL_INS_K ; ! потрытл 2023_03_11
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanameen ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU1_ajanamen ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajaneen ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU3_ajanen ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyyn ;


:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU3_een ;
:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXDU3_en ;

:%{SYNCH%} SG_X_PXPL2_yn ;
+Sg+Nom+PxPl2:%{SYNCH%}%>ы̄н K ;

:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXSG1_ajagum ;
:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXSG2_ajagyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} DU_NOM_PXSG2_ajagn ;!check
:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagameen ;
:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXDU1_ajagamen ;

:%{SYNCH%}	DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyyn ;
:%{SYNCH%}	DU_X_PXDU2_ajagyn ;
:%{SYNCH%}	DU_X_PXDU3_ajageen ;
:%{SYNCH%}	DU_X_PXDU3_ajagen ;
:%{SYNCH%} DU_X_PXPL1_ajaguv ;

:%{SYNCH%}  DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyyn ;
:%{SYNCH%}  DU_X_PXPL2_ajagyn ;

:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXSG1_ajanum ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXSG2_ajanyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXSG2_ajan ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajanyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXDU2_ajan ;

:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajanyn ;
:%{SYNCH%} PL_X_PXPL2_ajan ;
